California statutes. Insurance Code
(h) This section does not prohibit an insurer from cooperating voluntarily with the Department of Child Support Services to identify claimants who are also obligors who owe past-due child support and report those claimants to the Department of Child Support Services.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2020, Ch. 184, Sec. 47.   (SB 1255)   Effective January 1, 2021.   Operative January 1, 2020, pursuant to Section 13555.)
-------------------------------------------

13551.

Notwithstanding any other law, an insurer or insurance company, its directors, agents, and employees, an insured individual on whose behalf the company makes a payment, and a central reporting organization and its respective employees and agents authorized by an insurer to act on its behalf who, in good faith, release information in accordance with this article, withhold amounts from payment based on the latest information supplied by the Department of Child Support Services pursuant to Section 13550, or make disbursements in accordance with Section 13550 shall be in compliance with this section and any applicable fair claim settlement act, and shall be immune from any liability to the claimant or other interested party arising from the
 payment.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.   (AB 2802)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative January 1, 2020, pursuant to Section 13555.)
-------------------------------------------

13552.

(a) Data obtained pursuant to this article shall only be used for the purpose of identifying claimants who are also obligors who owe past-due child support. If the Department of Child Support Services does not identify an obligor in the data obtained pursuant to this article with a child support obligor, the Department of Child Support Services shall not maintain that data and shall immediately destroy that data.

(b) An insurer that provides, attempts to provide, or in any way accesses data pursuant to this article shall comply with all applicable state and federal
 laws for the protection of the privacy and the security of that data, including, but not limited to, the Insurance Information and Privacy Protection Act (Article 6.6
 (commencing with Section 791) of Chapter 1 of Part 2 of Division 1), the Information Practices Act of 1977 (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 1798) of Title 1.8 of Part 4 of Division 3 of the Civil Code), and the federal Health Insurance Portability and Accountability Act of 1996 (Public Law 104-191).

(c) The Department of Child Support Services shall consider any information received from an insurer as confidential. That information shall be used or disclosed only for the purpose of collecting past-due child support.

(d) Information provided by the Department of
 Child Support Services to an insurer, or its designated agent, for the purpose of
 identifying claimants who are also obligors shall not be used by the insurer or its agent for any other purpose, and shall not be disclosed to any person except to the extent necessary to identify and report a claimant who owes past-due child support. This subdivision does not apply to information contained in a child support lien or an income-withholding order received from the Department of Child Support Services after the insurer has identified and reported a claimant. 

(e) This section does not prohibit the Department of Child Support Services from disclosing aggregate data that does not reveal personally identifying information.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.   (AB 2802)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative January 1, 2020, pursuant to Section 13555.)
-------------------------------------------

13553.

(a) An insurer may satisfy its obligation to identify and report a claimant who owes past-due child support through the use of a central reporting organization. If an insurer does not use a central reporting organization to automate the process, the insurer shall determine if the claimant owes past-due child support before paying a claim.

(b) For claims involving periodic payments after the insurer has determined that benefits will be paid, the insurer shall only determine if the claimant owes past-due child support before the initial payment and either 12 months
 thereafter, or the insurer may provide a copy of the settlement to the Department of Child Support Services. 

(c) If a central reporting organization identifies a claimant who is also an obligor, the central reporting organization shall notify the Department of Child Support Services, and the Department of Child Support Services shall follow the requirements of subdivision (e) of Section 13550.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.   (AB 2802)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative January 1, 2020, pursuant to Section 13555.)
-------------------------------------------

13554.

For the purposes of this article, “central reporting organization” means a third-party service that automates the claims identifying process or provides interactive lookups.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.   (AB 2802)   Effective January 1, 2019.   Operative January 1, 2020, pursuant to Section 13555.)
-------------------------------------------

13555.

This article shall become operative on January 1, 2020.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 439, Sec. 1.   (AB 2802)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Conciliation [13600. - 13601.]

13600.

The department shall provide any person who files a complaint pursuant to Section 678.5, with the option of submitting any dispute involving cancellation or nonrenewal to conciliation pursuant to the following conciliation procedures:

(a) (1) The complaint shall first be reviewed by the department. Each insurer shall designate a responsible staff member whom the department may contact to determine whether a complaint may be resolved through a conciliation process.

(2) The complainant shall pay a filing fee of thirty-five dollars ($35), which shall be returned if the complainant prevails in whole or in part in conciliation.

(b) The department staff shall attempt to resolve the dispute over the telephone. The insurer’s representative shall have the authority to bind any insurer to any agreement reached over the telephone.

(c) The insurer shall notify the department of the representative’s identity in writing and immediately notify the department of any change in the designation.

(d) If the department cannot resolve the dispute by conciliation, the complaint shall be referred to the commissioner, who may, if he or she determines that there are reasonable grounds for believing that a violation of Section 678.5 has occurred, hold a hearing to determine whether a violation has occurred. In the event of a finding that a violation has occurred, the commissioner may order reinstatement of the policy.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1073, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

13601.

Nothing in this chapter shall preclude an insured or other aggrieved party from pursuing any available alternative remedy in lieu of conciliation or from pursuing that alternative remedy without first proceeding under this chapter, but the department shall have no jurisdiction to proceed under this chapter or resolve any dispute under this chapter during the pendency of any judicial action thereon initiated by an insured.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 1073, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Holocaust Era Insurance Registry [13800. - 13807.]

13800.

This chapter shall be known and may be cited as the Holocaust Victim Insurance Relief Act of 1999.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 827, Sec. 2.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

13801.

The Legislature finds and declares the following:

(a) During World War II, untold millions of lives and property were destroyed.

(b) In addition to the many atrocities that befell the victims of the Nazi regime, insurance claims that rightfully should have been paid out to the victims and their families, in many cases, were not.

(c) In many instances, insurance company records are the only proof of insurance policies held. In some cases, recollection of those policies’ very existence may have perished along with the Holocaust victims.

(d) At least 5,600 documented Holocaust survivors are living in California today. Many of these survivors and their descendents have been fighting for over 50 years to persuade insurance companies to settle unpaid or wrongfully paid claims. Survivors are asking that insurance companies come forth with any information they possess that could show proof of insurance policies held by Holocaust victims and survivors, in order to ensure that closure on this issue is swiftly brought to pass.

(e) Insurance companies doing business in the State of California have a responsibility to ensure that any involvement they or their related companies may have had with insurance policies of Holocaust victims are disclosed to the state and to ensure the rapid resolution of these questions, eliminating the further victimization of these policyholders and their families.

(f) The international Jewish community is in active negotiations with responsible insurance companies through the International Commission on Holocaust Era Insurance Claims to resolve all outstanding insurance claims issues. This chapter is necessary to protect the claims and interests of California residents, as well as to encourage the development of a resolution to these issues through the international process or through direct action by the State of California, as necessary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 827, Sec. 2.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

13802.

For purposes of this chapter, the following definitions shall apply:

(a) “Holocaust victim” means any person who was persecuted during the period of 1929 to 1945, inclusive, by Nazi Germany, its allies, or sympathizers.

(b) “Related company” means any parent, subsidiary, reinsurer, successor in interest, managing general agent, or affiliate company of the insurer.

(c) “Proceeds” means the face value or other payout value of insurance policies and annuities plus reasonable interest to date of payment without diminution for wartime or immediate postwar currency devaluation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 827, Sec. 2.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

13803.

The commissioner shall establish and maintain within the department a central registry containing records and information relating to insurance policies, as described in Section 13804, of Holocaust victims, living and deceased. The registry shall be known as the Holocaust Era Insurance Registry. The Attorney General, in coordination with the department, shall establish appropriate mechanisms to ensure public access to the registry.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 827, Sec. 2.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

13804.

(a) Any insurer currently doing business in the state that sold life, property, liability, health, annuities, dowry, educational, or casualty insurance policies, directly or through a related company, to persons in Europe, which were in effect between 1920 and 1945, whether the sale occurred before or after the insurer and the related company became related, shall, within 180 days following enactment of this act, file or cause to be filed the following information with the commissioner to be entered into the registry:

(1) The number of those insurance policies.

(2) The holder, beneficiary, and current status of those policies.

(3) The city of origin, domicile, or address for each policyholder listed in the policies.

(b) In addition, each insurer subject to subdivision (a) shall certify to any of the following:

(1) That the proceeds of the policies described in subdivision (a) have been paid to the designated beneficiaries or their heirs where that person or persons, after diligent search, could be located and identified.

(2) That the proceeds of the policies where the beneficiaries or heirs could not, after diligent search, be located or identified, have been distributed to Holocaust survivors or to qualified charitable nonprofit organizations for the purpose of assisting Holocaust survivors.

(3) That a court of law has certified in a legal proceeding resolving the rights of unpaid policyholders, their heirs, and beneficiaries, a plan for the distribution of the proceeds.

(4) That the proceeds have not been distributed and the amount of those proceeds.

An insurer who certifies as true any material matter pursuant to this subdivision, which the insurer knows to be false, is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(c) An insurer currently doing business in the state that did not sell any insurance policies in Europe prior to 1945, shall not be subject to this section if a related company, whether or not authorized and currently doing business in the state, has made a filing under this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 827, Sec. 2.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

13805.

Any insurer that knowingly files information about a policy required by this chapter that is false shall, with respect to that policy, be liable for a civil penalty not to exceed five thousand dollars ($5,000), which penalty is hereby appropriated to the department to be used by it to aid in the resolution of Holocaust insurance claims.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 827, Sec. 2.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

13806.

The commissioner shall suspend the certificate of authority to conduct insurance business in the state of any insurer that fails to comply with the requirements of this chapter by the 210th day after this section becomes effective, until the time that the insurer complies with this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 827, Sec. 2.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

13807.

The commissioner shall adopt rules to implement this chapter within 90 days of its effective date. The rules shall be adopted as emergency regulations in accordance with Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of the Government Code, and for the purposes of that chapter, including Section 11349.6 of the Government Code, the adoption of the rules shall be considered by the Office of Administrative Law to be necessary for the immediate preservation of the public peace, health and safety, and general welfare.

(History: Added by Stats. 1999, Ch. 827, Sec. 2.   Effective October 10, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 5. Slavery Era Insurance Policies [13810. - 13813.]

13810.

The commissioner shall request and obtain information from insurers licensed and doing business in this state regarding any records of slaveholder insurance policies issued by any predecessor corporation during the slavery era.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 934, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

13811.

The commissioner shall obtain the names of any slaveholders or slaves described in those insurance records, and shall make the information available to the public and the Legislature.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 934, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

13812.

Each insurer licensed and doing business in this state shall research and report to the commissioner with respect to any records within the insurer’s possession or knowledge relating to insurance policies issued to slaveholders that provided coverage for damage to or death of their slaves.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 934, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

13813.

Descendants of slaves, whose ancestors were defined as private property, dehumanized, divided from their families, forced to perform labor without appropriate compensation or benefits, and whose ancestors’ owners were compensated for damages by insurers, are entitled to full disclosure.

(History: Added by Stats. 2000, Ch. 934, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 6. Affordable Housing Insurance Coverage Study [13850. - 13855.]

13850.

The Legislature finds and declares all of the following:

(a) Hundreds of thousands of affordable homes have been built across California to meet the needs of low-income households and people experiencing homelessness. The state has invested billions of dollars in these homes through programs administered by the Department of Housing and Community Development and the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee. 

(b) The United States is facing an industrywide insurance crisis, especially in the property insurance sector. According to Marsh’s Global Insurance Market Index, property insurance rates have increased for 27 consecutive
 quarters, continuing the longest run of increases since the inception of the index in 2012. 

(c) Affordable housing entities in urban, suburban, and rural communities across California are facing limited availability of insurance coverage, significant premium and deductible cost increases, and reductions in the scope and quality of coverage. These issues are present in property, liability, and builder’s risk insurance. 

(d) Affordable housing entities have limited options to manage increased insurance costs due to their mission and legal requirements to keep rents at affordable levels for low-income households. As a result, affordable housing entities are particularly vulnerable to insurance cost increases, which now present an urgent threat to the fiscal solvency and stability of
 affordable housing across California. 

(e) While long-term structural reforms to the insurance market may be necessary, there is an immediate need for transparency and data-driven decisionmaking. Currently, there is limited publicly available information regarding how insurance market dynamics uniquely affect multifamily affordable housing. In particular, data on premium and deductible levels and trends and their relationship to claims types and amounts, resident composition, and property characteristics remain unanswered.

(f) Efforts at a nationwide level, such as the 2024 voluntary data call by the National Association of Insurance Commissioners, have primarily focused on single-family homeowners’ insurance, leaving multifamily and affordable housing insurance trends largely
 unexamined.

(g) The lack of reliable and comprehensive data impairs the state’s ability to respond effectively to the insurance crisis affecting its affordable housing investments. Granting the Department of Insurance the authority to request, collect, and analyze insurance-related data specific to affordable housing would enhance transparency and inform future policy and budget decisions.

(h) Collecting this data will help preserve state investments, protect low-income residents from housing instability, and enable California to develop targeted strategies to address systemic insurance challenges in the affordable housing sector.

(i) There is a compelling state interest in understanding how the insurance market’s current dynamics affect the availability and sustainability of affordable housing, and in exploring
 targeted solutions to reduce risks and ensure the long-term viability of publicly funded affordable housing developments.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 728, Sec. 1.   (AB 1339)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 13855.)
-------------------------------------------

13851.

(a) (1) The Department of Insurance shall conduct a study of the property, liability, and builders’ risk insurance coverages available to affordable housing entities as defined in Section 13907 and receiving a grant, loan, or tax credit awarded by the Department of Housing and Community Development or the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee intended to serve lower income households, as defined in Section 50079.5 of the Health and Safety Code.

(2) The department shall conduct this study in consultation with the affordable housing entities described in paragraph (1), admitted
 insurers, providers of nonprofit insurance services, risk-sharing pools for public housing authorities and nongovernmental owners of affordable housing properties, insurance captives, risk retention groups, and other relevant state agencies, including the Department of Housing and Community Development and the California Tax Credit Allocation Committee. 

(b) An insurer, upon the request of the commissioner, shall provide and make available any information necessary to comply with the requirements of this section. Any information provided to the department by an insurer shall be considered a trade secret, confidential, privileged, or otherwise exempt from disclosure under the California Public Records Act (Division 10 (commencing with Section 7920.000) of Title 1 of the Government Code). Nothing in this section prohibits
 the commissioner from preparing and publishing reports, analyses, or other documents using the data received under this section so long as the data is in aggregate form and does not permit the identification of information related to individual companies.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 728, Sec. 1.   (AB 1339)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 13855.)
-------------------------------------------

13852.

In conducting the study described in subdivision (a) of Section 13851, the department shall do all of the following: 

(a) Collect information necessary to conduct the study from relevant insurers with the affordable housing entities described in subdivision (a) of Section 13851.

(b) Identify barriers to keeping the affordable housing entities appropriately insured.

(c) Analyze and request any other relevant information that may help the department analyze the availability of property, liability, and builders’ risk insurance coverage for the affordable housing entities
 described in subdivision (a) of Section 13851. 

(d) Analyze trends impacting market availability of property, liability, and builders’ risk insurance coverage for the affordable housing entities described in subdivision (a) of Section 13851. 

(e) (1) Analyze and request any other relevant information that may help the department analyze how, if at all, insurers consider the following in determinations of insurance policy offers or rate setting:

(A) The level or source of income of an individual or group of individuals residing or intending to reside upon the property to be insured, if the individual or group of individuals is not the owner of the real property.

(B) The receipt of assistance, intended for housing, from the federal or state government, or from a local public entity, as defined in Section 50079 of the Health and Safety Code, including, but not limited to, federal vouchers issued under Section 8 of the United States Housing Act of 1937 (42 U.S.C. Sec. 1437f), by an individual or group of individuals residing or intending to reside upon the property insured or to be insured.

(2) The designation of real property containing a residential dwelling unit as affordable to residents at a specific income level pursuant to statute, regulations, or restrictive declaration, or pursuant to a regulatory agreement with a state governmental entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 728, Sec. 1.   (AB 1339)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 13855.)
-------------------------------------------

13853.

(a) The department shall submit a report on the study described in subdivision (a) of Section 13851 to the Senate Committee on Insurance and the Assembly Committee on Insurance within one year of the appropriation made pursuant to Section 13854.

(b) The report shall make recommendations on potential policy and budget options to address insurance coverage cost and access challenges for the affordable housing entities described in subdivision (a) of Section 13851, as
 identified in the study. 

(c) The report submitted to the Legislature pursuant to this section shall be submitted pursuant to Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 728, Sec. 1.   (AB 1339)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 13855.)
-------------------------------------------

13854.

Implementation of this chapter is contingent upon an appropriation by the Legislature for purposes of this chapter in the annual Budget Act or another statute.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 728, Sec. 1.   (AB 1339)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, pursuant to Section 13855.)
-------------------------------------------

13855.

This chapter shall remain in effect only until January 1, 2031, and as of that date is repealed.

(History: Added by Stats. 2025, Ch. 728, Sec. 1.   (AB 1339)   Effective January 1, 2026.   Repealed as of January 1, 2031, by its own provisions.   Note: Repeal affects Chapter 6, commencing with Section 13850.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 4. AFFORDABLE HOUSING ENTITIES RISK RETENTION POOL [13900. - 13907.]

13900.

An affordable housing entity may join with one or more other affordable housing entities in an arrangement providing for the pooling of self-insured claims or losses with respect to any of the following:

(a) Insurance covering all or any part of any tort liability.

(b) Insurance covering any employee of the affordable housing entity against all or any part of his or her liability for injury resulting from an act or omission in the scope of employment.

(c) Insurance covering any board member, officer, partner, manager, member, or volunteer of the affordable housing entity against any liability
 that may arise from any act or omission in the scope of participation with the affordable housing entity.

(d) Insurance covering any loss arising from physical damage to motor vehicles, personal property, real property, or other property owned or operated by the affordable housing entity.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 384, Sec. 1.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13901.

(a) The pooling arrangement established pursuant to this division shall not be considered insurance, and shall not be subject to regulation under this code.

(b) All affordable housing entities participating in a pooling arrangement established pursuant to this division shall be given written notice, in at least 10-point type, that the pool is not regulated by the Insurance Commissioner and that the state insurance insolvency guaranty funds are not available to safeguard its risk.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 384, Sec. 1.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13902.

(a) An insurance pool that is established pursuant to this division may be organized as a nonprofit corporation, limited liability company, partnership, or trust, whether organized under the laws of this state or another state or operating in another state.

(b) An insurance pool that is established pursuant to this division shall have initial pooled resources of not less than two million five hundred thousand dollars ($2,500,000) in the form of cash or cash equivalents.

(c) An insurance pool that is established pursuant to this division shall maintain adequate reinsurance to protect against its risks.

(d) An insurance pool that is established pursuant to this division shall furnish a copy of the pool’s annual audited financial statement and most recent actuarial review, by first-class mail or by any other method of delivery, including electronic transmission, to the Insurance Commissioner, the Assembly Committee on Housing and Community Development, the Assembly Committee on Insurance, the Senate Committee on Insurance, and the Senate Committee on Housing within 180 days of the close of the pool’s fiscal year. If, in the period of time since the last submittal required by this subdivision, any of the following has occurred, the transmittal letter accompanying the annual audited financial statement and most recent actuarial review shall so indicate and shall provide a brief description of each matter:

(1) There has been a change to the pool’s plan of financing, management, or operation, including a material amendment to any of those plans.

(2) A claims audit report has been filed with a regulatory body with respect to the pool.

(3) A report of examination issued by a regulatory body with respect to the pool has been received.

(4) There has been a material change in the scope of the regulation of the pool by other states in which the pool operates.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 493, Sec. 3.   (SB 1512)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

13903.

All participating affordable housing entities in any insurance pool, established pursuant to this division, are required to agree to pay premiums or make other mandatory financial contributions, as determined by the governing board, provided for by the insurance pool arrangement, that are necessary to ensure a financially sound risk pool.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 384, Sec. 1.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13904.

Any insurance pool, established pursuant to this division, shall not insure against any liability that may be insured against pursuant to Division 4 (commencing with Section 3200) of the Labor Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 384, Sec. 1.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13905.

Nothing in this division shall be construed to authorize an affordable housing entity to pay for, to insure, to contract for payment of, or to provide for payment for, any part of a claim or judgment against an employee of the affordable housing entity for punitive or exemplary damages.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 384, Sec. 1.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13906.

For the purpose of this division, “affordable housing” means housing developments in which some of the dwelling units may be purchased or rented, with or without government assistance, on a basis that is affordable to persons or families of low or moderate income, as defined in Section 50093 of the Health and Safety Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 384, Sec. 1.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

13907.

For the purpose of this division, an “affordable housing entity” means any of the following:

(a) A housing authority created under the laws of this state or another jurisdiction and any agency or instrumentality of a housing authority, including, but not limited to, a legal entity created to conduct a self-insurance program for housing authorities that complies with Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 6500) of Division 7 of Title 1 of the Government Code.

(b) A nonprofit corporation organized under the laws of this state or another state that is engaged in providing affordable housing.

(c) A
 partnership, general or limited, or limited liability company that is engaged in providing affordable housing and that is affiliated with a housing authority described in subdivision (a) or a nonprofit corporation described in subdivision (b) if the housing authority or nonprofit corporation has one or more of the following:

(1) A financial or ownership interest in the partnership or limited liability company or the right to acquire that interest.

(2) The power to direct the management or policies of the partnership or limited liability company.

(3) A contract to lease, manage, or operate the affordable housing owned by the partnership or limited liability company.

(History: Added by Stats. 2010, Ch. 384, Sec. 1.   (AB 2327)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 5. INSURANCE ADJUSTERS [14000. - 16032.]



CHAPTER 1. Insurance Adjuster Act [14000. - 14099.]



  ARTICLE 1. General Provisions [14000. - 14002.]

14000.

This chapter may be cited as the Insurance Adjuster Act.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14001.

As used in this chapter:

(a) “Commissioner” means the Insurance Commissioner.

(b) “Department” means the Department of Insurance.

(c) “Licensee” means a person licensed under this chapter.

(d) “Manager” means the individual under whose direction, control, charge, or management the business of a licensee is operated.

(e) “Person” includes any individual, firm, company, association, organization, partnership, limited liability company, and corporation.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 176.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

14002.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed as entitling any person to practice law in this state, unless he is an active member of the State Bar of California.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Administration [14010. - 14013.]

14010.

The department succeeds to and is vested with all the duties, powers, purposes, responsibilities, and jurisdiction previously vested in the Bureau of Collection and Investigative Services with respect to the licensing of insurance adjusters.

Any reference to prior licensing shall be deemed to licensing under the Private Investigator and Adjuster Act.

The commissioner shall administer and enforce the provisions of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14011.

The commissioner may, in accordance with the State Civil Service Act, appoint such inspectors, investigators, and other personnel as may be necessary for the administration and enforcement of this chapter.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14012.

Every power and duty granted to or imposed upon the commissioner may be exercised by any other officer or employee of the department authorized by the commissioner, but the commissioner shall have the supervision of and the responsibility for all powers and duties exercised by such officers and employees.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------

14013.

The commissioner may adopt and enforce reasonable rules:

(a) Fixing the qualifications of licensees and managers, in addition to those prescribed in this chapter, necessary to promote and protect the public welfare. 

(b) Carrying out generally the provisions of this chapter, including regulation of the conduct of licensees.

(c) For a change in the classification of a licensee, or in the type of business organization upon application therefor by a licensee, and to prescribe the fee, if any, to be paid.

(History: Added by Stats. 1980, Ch. 1190, Sec. 11.   Operative July 1, 1981, by Sec. 13 of Ch. 1190.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Regulation, Licensing, and Registration [14020. - 14047.]

14020.

(a) A person shall not engage in a business regulated by this chapter, or act or assume to act as, or represent themselves to be, a licensee unless the person is licensed under this chapter.

(b) A person shall not falsely represent that the person is employed by a licensee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 502, Sec. 2.   (SB 240)   Effective October 3, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

14021.

An insurance adjuster within the meaning of this chapter is a person other than a private investigator as defined in Section 7521 of the Business and Professions Code who, for any consideration whatsoever, engages in business or accepts employment to furnish, or agrees to make, or makes, any investigation for the purpose of obtaining, information in the course of adjusting or otherwise participating in the disposal of, any claim under or in connection with a policy of insurance on behalf of an insurer or engages in soliciting insurance adjustment business or aids an insurer in any manner with reference to:

Crime or wrongs done or threatened against the United States of America or any state or territory of the United States of America; the identity, habits, conduct, business, occupation, honesty, integrity, credibility, knowledge, trustworthiness, efficiency, loyalty, activity, movement, whereabouts, affiliations, associations, transactions, acts, reputation, or character of any person; the location, disposition, or recovery of lost or stolen property; the cause or responsibility for fires, libels, losses, accidents, or damage or injury to persons or to property; or securing evidence to be used before any court, board, officer, or investigating committee.

Notwithstanding any other provision of law, this section is in no way intended to limit the ability of a duly licensed independent insurance adjuster to perform the duties of an independent insurance adjuster for any other entity.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1997, Ch. 96, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1998.)
-------------------------------------------

14022.

This chapter does not apply to:

(a) (1) A person employed exclusively and regularly by one employer in connection with the affairs of the employer only and if there exists an employer-employee relationship, except as provided in paragraph (2).

(2) After a declared state of emergency, as defined in Section 8558 of the Government Code, or other emergency declared by a public official, a person licensed under this chapter or a qualified manager shall require that all nonlicensed adjusters under the supervision of that
 person or manager read and understand the most recent notice and adjuster handbook prepared by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 14046 no later than 15 calendar days from the date on which the nonlicensed adjuster began claims adjusting activity in California.

(3) In enforcing this chapter, the department shall not be required to investigate whether a person
 is employed exclusively and regularly by one employer pursuant to paragraph (1).

(b) An officer or employee of the United States of America, or of this state or a political subdivision thereof, while that officer or employee is engaged in the performance of official duties.

(c) A person engaged exclusively in the business of obtaining and furnishing information as to the financial rating of persons.

(d) A charitable philanthropic society or association duly incorporated under the laws of this state, which is organized and maintained for the public good and not for private profit.

(e) An attorney performing the duties of an
 attorney.
